Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1404
Public power district; joint project authorized; limitation; study.

(1) A public power district may plan, finance, develop, acquire, purchase, construct, reconstruct, improve, enlarge, own, operate, and maintain an undivided interest as a tenant in common in a project situated within or without the state jointly with one or more public power districts in this state owning electric distribution facilities, hydrogen production, storage, or distribution facilities, or ethanol production or distribution facilities or with any political subdivision or agency of this state or of any other state and may make such plans and enter into such contracts not inconsistent with the Joint Public Power Authority Act as are necessary or appropriate, except that membership of public power districts in a joint authority shall consist only of public power districts located within this state.

(2) Nothing in the Joint Public Power Authority Act shall prevent public power districts from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 53;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 21.